Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-463.01
Cancellation of operator's license, defined.

Cancellation of operator's license shall mean the annulment or termination by formal action of the Department of Motor Vehicles of a person's license because of some error or defect in such license or because the licensee is no longer entitled to such license, and without prejudice to application for a new license which may be made at any time after such cancellation.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 67.